Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1139.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 section to read:Section 2422. Water Bottle Filling Stations.--(a) This section is intended to:(1) Encourage the consumption of potable water using reusable water bottles as an alternative to single-use disposable water bottles or sugar-sweetened beverages.(2) Provide consumers with a convenient means, in visible and user-friendly locations, to fill reusable water bottles with clean, potable water.(3) Provide a more environmentally friendly alternative regarding potable water.(4) Provide consumers with a more cost-effective alternative regarding potable water.(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, standards relating to water bottle filling stations shall comply with the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the "Pennsylvania Construction Code Act," and other applicable plumbing standards.(c) The following general standards shall apply:(1) A water bottle filling station shall not be:(i) accessible to the mouth of a drinker;(ii) subject to immersion; or(iii) installed within a restroom.(2) A water bottle filling station may discharge water directly or indirectly into a separate or combination drainage system.(d) Water bottle filling stations shall be installed as follows:(1) For each building or structure of the Commonwealth which is constructed after the effective date of this subsection, a 20250HB1139PN2857 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 water bottle filling station shall be installed where a drinking fountain is required to be installed.(2) For each building or structure of this Commonwealth that undergoes a major improvement involving plumbing or pipe fitting infrastructure after the effective date of this subsection, a water bottle filling station shall be installed where an operational drinking fountain is or was required to be installed.(e) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this section.(f) The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of General Services of the Commonwealth."Water bottle filling station." A unit which:(1) supplies potable water to a water bottle from a downward facing water orifice;(2) delivers a minimum of eight gallons per hour of water at a temperature of not more than fifty (50) degrees Fahrenheit;(3) is mounted on the wall or floor;(4) is a separate unit or a combination unit that includes a drinking fountain; and (5) INCORPORATES A THIRD-PARTY CERTIFIED WATER FILTER CERTIFIED TO NSF/ANSI 53 FOR LEAD REDUCTION; AND(5) (6) complies with all applicable water quality standards under the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the "Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act."Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1139PN2857 - 3 - <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829